src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/proper-odd_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable propers belonging to LONDON-plc, PLACE-DIM-plc, DUORTNUS-plc, RANES-plc, CAVKKUS-plc, ANAR-mal, BALAK-plc, SARAK-plc, GUOLBBA-plc, ADJAGAT-plc, EATNAMAT-plc, ANGELIT-org

Tests:
  Proper - Siglufjörđur: # LONDON-plc
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Siglufjörđura, Siglufjörđur, "Siglufjörđur:a", "Siglufjörđur:", Siglufjörđur-a, Siglufjörđur-]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Siglufjörđurii, "Siglufjörđur:i", "Siglufjörđur:ii", Siglufjörđur-ii, Siglufjörđur-i]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [siglufjörđurlažžii, siglufjörđurlažžai, siglufjörđuralažžii, siglufjörđuralažžai]

  Proper - Silbabološ: # PLACE-DIM-plc
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Silbabološ
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Silbabološ, Silbaboloža]
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Silbaboložii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [silbaboložlažžii, silbaboložlažžai]


  Proper - Vállášvuomus: # DUORTNUS-plc
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Vállášvupmosa, Vállášvupmos]
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Vállášvupmosii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [vállášvuomuslažžii, vállášvuomuslažžai]

  Proper - Ráneš: # RANES-plc
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Rátnáha, Rátnát, Ráneš, Ráneža]
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Rátnáhii, Ránežii]
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [ránešlažžii, ránešlažžai, ránežlažžai, ránežlažžii]

  Proper - Čávkkus: # CAVKKUS-plc
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Čávkoha, Čávkot, Čavkosa, Čavkos]
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Čávkohii, Čavkosii]
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [čavkkuslažžii, čavkkuslažžai, čávkkuslažžii, čávkkuslažžai]

  Proper - Ánddir: # ANAR-mal
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: [Ánddira, Ánddir]
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ánddirii
    
  Proper - Guorpak: # BALAK-plc
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Guorpaga, Guorpak]
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Guorpagii
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [guorpaklažžii, guorpaklažžai]

  Proper - Harrok: # SARAK-plc
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Harroha, Harrok]
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Harrohii
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [harroklažžii, harroklažžai]

  Proper - Kruvnnasavu: # GUOLBBA-plc
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Kruvnnasavvona, Kruvnnasavvon]
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Kruvnnasavvonii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [kruvnnasavulažžii, kruvnnasavulažžai]

  Proper - Njárgalássát: # ADJAGAT-plc
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Skoahppaádjagiid
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Skoahppaádjagiidda
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [skoahppaájalažžii, skoahppaájalažžai]

  Proper - Dálvasnjaŋgguhat: # EATNAMAT-plc
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiid
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiidda
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [dálvasnjaŋggutlažžii, dálvasnjaŋggutlažžai]

  Proper - Angelit: # ANGELIT-org
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Gen: Angeliid
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: Angeliidda
